Alabama, session 2026rs, HB148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
(a) Parents have the fundamental right to direct the
education, upbringing, care, and control of their child.
(b) The government may not burden the fundamental right
of a parent to direct the education, upbringing, care, and
control of his or her child unless the government demonstrates
that the application of the burden as applied to the parent is
in furtherance of a compelling governmental interest and the
government uses the least restrictive means possible to
further that interest.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END OF PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
Page 2

shall be held in accordance with Sections 284 and 285 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws of this
state. The appropriate election official shall assign a ballot
number for the proposed constitutional amendment on the
election ballot and shall set forth the following description
of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Proposing an amendment to the Constitution of Alabama
of 2022, to provide that parents have a fundamental right to
direct the education, upbringing, care, and control of their
children, and that the government may not burden that
fundamental right unless the government demonstrates that the
application of the burden as applied to the parent is in
furtherance of a compelling governmental interest and uses the
least restrictive means possible to further that interest.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
a part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved
by a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 3